trunk/apertium-eo-es/apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
<pardef n="i__vbntr">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>intan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>intajn</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>intan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>antaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>antan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>antajn</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>antan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>onta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp2"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ontaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ante</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inte</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>antaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>igi</l>       <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igas</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igis</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igos</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igus</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igus</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igintaj</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igintan</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igintajn</l>  <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igintan</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iganta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igantaj</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igantan</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igantajn</l>  <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iganta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igantan</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igonta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igonta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igontaj</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igintaj</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igante</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginte</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igu</l>       <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igintaj</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iganta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igantaj</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iganta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iĝi</l>       <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝas</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝis</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝos</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝus</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝus</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝinta</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintaj</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintajn</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝanta</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝantaj</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="aliri">            <i>alir</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="alterni">            <i>altern</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="aparteni">            <i>aparten</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="barakti">            <i>barakt</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="boli">            <i>bol</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="brui">            <i>bru</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="cerbumi">            <i>cerbum</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="defali">            <i>defal</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="delasi farbon"><i>delas</i><par n="i__vbntr"/><p><l><b/>farbon</l><r><g><b/>farbon</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="dependi">            <i>depend</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="diferenci">            <i>diferenc</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="dogmumi">            <i>dogmum</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="duondormi">            <i>duondorm</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="ekflugi">            <i>ekflug</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="eksalti">            <i>eksalt</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="eksplodi">            <i>eksplod</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="elmigri">            <i>elmigr</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="enflui">            <i>enflu</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="erari">            <i>erar</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="farti">            <i>fart</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="fermenti">            <i>ferment</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="flami">            <i>flam</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="flui">            <i>flu</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="formiki">            <i>formik</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="frenezumi">            <i>frenezum</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="funebri">            <i>funebr</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="gliti">            <i>glit</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="halti">            <i>halt</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="interrilati">            <i>interrilat</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="kartavi">            <i>kartav</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="konduti">            <i>kondut</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="kontrakti">            <i>kontrakt</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="kunflui">            <i>kunflu</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="kuŝi">            <i>kuŝ</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="malfrui">            <i>malfru</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="malĝoji">            <i>malĝoj</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="migri">            <i>migr</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="naĝi">            <i>naĝ</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="odoraĉi">            <i>odoraĉ</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="paroli pri"><i>parol</i><par n="i__vbntr"/><p><l><b/>pri</l><r><g><b/>pri</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="peki">            <i>pek</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="persisti">            <i>persist</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="plonĝi">            <i>plonĝ</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="postvivi">            <i>postviv</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="proliferi">            <i>prolifer</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="rajdi">            <i>rajd</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="responsi pri"><i>respons</i><par n="i__vbntr"/><p><l><b/>pri</l><r><g><b/>pri</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="rezigni pri"><i>rezign</i><par n="i__vbntr"/><p><l><b/>pri</l><r><g><b/>pri</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ripozi">            <i>ripoz</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="sedi">            <i>sed</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="skermi">            <i>skerm</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="subnaĝi">            <i>subnaĝ</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="temi pri"><i>tem</i><par n="i__vbntr"/><p><l><b/>pri</l><r><g><b/>pri</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="tremi">            <i>trem</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="urini">            <i>urin</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="veli">            <i>vel</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="vojaĝi">            <i>vojaĝ</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="ĝermi">            <i>ĝerm</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="ŝimi">            <i>ŝim</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="ekstarti">            <i>ekstart</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
<e lm="ekfunkcii">            <i>ekfunkci</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
